Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions

37-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Addictive disease” means a chronic, often relapsing, brain disease that causes compulsive alcohol or drug seeking and use despite harmful consequences to the individual who is addicted and to those around him or her.

“Board” means the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities.

“Community service board” means a public mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases board established pursuant to Code Section 37-2-6.

“Consumer” means a natural person who has been or is a recipient of disability services.

“County board of health” means a county board of health established in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 31 and includes its duly authorized agents.

“Department” means the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and includes its duly authorized agents and designees.

“Developmental disability” means a severe, chronic disability of an individual that:

Is attributable to a significant intellectual disability, or any combination of a significant intellectual disability and physical impairments;

Is manifested before the individual attains age 22;

Is likely to continue indefinitely;

Results in substantial functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of major life activities:

Self-care;

Receptive and expressive language;

Learning;

Mobility;

Self-direction; and

Capacity for independent living; and

Reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic services, individualized supports, or other forms of assistance which are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated.

“Disability” means:

Mental or emotional illness;

Developmental disability; or

Addictive disease.

“Disability services” means services to the disabled or services which are designed to prevent or ameliorate the effect of a disability.

“Disabled” means any person or persons having a disability.

(11.1)
“Mental health care agent” means an agent appointed under a psychiatric advance directive in accordance with Chapter 11 of Title 37.

“Mental illness” means a disorder of thought or mood which significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to cope with the ordinary demands of life.

“Mentally ill” means having a mental illness.

“Peace officer” means any federal, city, or county police officer, any officer of the Georgia State Patrol, or any sheriff or deputy sheriff.

“Penal offense” means a violation of a law of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision thereof for which the offender may be confined in a state prison or a city or county jail or any other penal institution.

“Physician” means any person duly authorized to practice medicine in this state under Chapter 34 of Title 43.

(16.1)
“Psychiatric advance directive” means a written document voluntarily executed by an individual in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-11-9.

“Psychologist” means any person duly licensed to practice psychology in this state under Chapter 39 of Title 43.

“Regional board” means a regional board established in accordance with Code Section 37-2-4.1 as that Code section existed on June 30, 2002.

“Regional coordinator” means an employee of the department who acts as the department’s agent and designee to manage community services for consumers of disability services within a mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases region
established in accordance with Code Section 37-2-3.

“Regional office” means an office created pursuant to Code Section 37-2-4.1. Such office shall be an office of the department and serve as the entity for the administration of disability services in a region.

“Regional planning board” means a planning board established in accordance with Code Section 37-2-4.1.

“Regional services administrator” means an employee of the department who, under the supervision of the regional coordinator, manages the purchase or authorization of services, or both, for consumers of disability services, the assessment and coordination
of services, and ongoing monitoring and evaluation of services provided within a region established in accordance with Code Section 37-2-3.

“Regional state hospital administrator” means the chief administrative officer of a state owned or state operated hospital and the state owned or operated community programs in a region. The regional state hospital administrator has overall management
responsibility for the regional state hospital and manages services provided by employees of the regional state hospital and employees of state owned or operated community programs within a mental health, developmental disabilities,
and addictive diseases region established in accordance with Code Section 37-2-3.

“Resident” means a person who is a legal resident of the State of Georgia.

“State mental health facility” means, for purposes of this title and Title 31, a hospital, inpatient unit, or other institution operated by or under contract with the department for its operation, including the replacement or reorganization of the facility.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 6; Ga. L.
1993, p. 1445, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, §§ 1-6, 2-1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 2/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2016, p. 257, § 7/SB 319; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-20/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, added paragraphs (11.1) and (16.1).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, a semicolon was deleted from the end of paragraph (2), a second subdivision (8)(D)(ii) was redesignated as subdivision (8)(D)(iii), and the definitions in paragraphs (12) and (13) were arranged in alphabetical
order.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 257, § 1/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that the mental health and wellness needs of Georgia’s citizens require the availability of trained mental health professionals who can accurately
diagnose, treat, prescribe, and appropriately assess the mental and emotional illnesses, disorders, and conditions from which they suffer and the vocational, educational, interpersonal, and intrapersonal needs essential to living and
learning how to live productive and useful lives. It is the intent of the General Assembly to assure geographical and financial access for all of Georgia’s citizens to excellent mental health services to the extent that Georgia’s resources
and regulations permit. To these ends, Georgia regulates its licensed psychiatrists, psychologists, professional counselors, marriage and family therapists, and clinical social workers who provide graduate level professional services
to Georgia’s private and public mental health services and to its public mental health, educational, and vocational support systems. The General Assembly seeks in such regulatory process to protect the public and assure it receives
high quality and appropriate services and to define the scopes of practice and diagnostic authority for each of these professional groups consistent with the graduate level training and supervision, or its equivalent, that the members
of each profession have sought and successfully completed. The General Assembly has empowered and authorized the Georgia Composite Medical Board, the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists, and the Georgia Composite Board of Professional
Counselors, Social Workers, and Marriage and Family Therapists to fulfill these responsibilities and expects them to work together to assure a continuum of professional services that ensure appropriate diagnostic and assessment functions
for each profession and the psychotherapeutic and counseling treatment services appropriate to each profession. The General Assembly recognizes that advances in medicine, science, education, training, and service delivery occur constantly
in our modern history and therefore also expects the regulatory boards for each profession to assure that its licensees seek and successfully complete appropriate continuing education and training for the functions and services authorized
to each profession.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).

For article, “Courts: General Provisions,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 293 (2011).

37-1-2.
Legislative findings as to mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease problems and services; role of county governing authorities; purpose of this chapter and Chapter 2 of this title.

The General Assembly finds that the state has a need to continually improve its system for providing effective, efficient, and quality mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease services. Further, the General Assembly finds that a
comprehensive range of quality services and opportunities is vitally important to the existence and well-being of individuals with mental health, developmental disability, or addictive disease needs and their families. The General
Assembly further finds that the state has an obligation and a responsibility to develop and implement planning and service delivery systems which focus on a core set of consumer oriented, community based values and principles which
include, but are not limited to, the following:

Consumers and families should have choices about services and providers and should have substantive input into the planning and delivery of all services;

A single point of accountability should exist for fiscal, service, and administrative issues to ensure better coordination of services among all programs and providers and to promote cost-effective, efficient service delivery and administration;

The system should be appropriately comprehensive and adaptive to allow consumers and their families to access the services they desire and need;

Public programs are the foundation of the service planning and delivery system and they should be valued and nurtured; at the same time, while assuring comparable standards of quality, private sector involvement should be increased to allow for expanded
consumer choice and improved cost effectiveness;

Planning should begin at the local level and include local government, consumers, families, advocates, and other interested local parties;

The system should ensure that the needs of consumers who are most in need are met at the appropriate service levels; at the same time, prevention strategies should be emphasized for those disabilities which are known to be preventable;

The system should be designed to provide the highest quality of services utilizing flexibility in funding, incentives, and outcome evaluation techniques which reinforce quality, accountability, efficiency, and consumer satisfaction;

The functions of service planning, coordination, contracting, resource allocation, and consumer assessment should be separated from the actual treatment, habilitation, and prevention services provided by contractors;

Consumers and families should have a single, community based point of entry into the system;

Consumers, staff, providers, and regional planning board and community service board members should receive ongoing training and education and should have access to key management resources such as information systems and technical and professional support
services; and

The department is responsible for ensuring the appropriate use of state, federal, and other funds to provide quality services for individuals with mental health, developmental disabilities, or addictive disease needs who are served by the public system
and to protect consumers of these services from abuse and maltreatment.

Local governments, specifically county governing authorities, have provided outstanding leadership and support for mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease programs, and the General Assembly finds that their investments, both personal
and capital, should be valued and utilized in any improved system. As such, the state and any new governing structure should take special precautions to ensure that the county governing authorities have an expanded level of input
into decision making and resource allocation and that any services or programs should continue to use and expand their use of county facilities and resources wherever appropriate and possible.

The purpose of this chapter and Chapter 2 of this title is to provide for a comprehensive and improved mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease services planning and delivery system in this state which will develop and promote the
essential public interests of the state and its citizens. The provisions of this chapter and Chapter 2 of this title shall be liberally construed to achieve their purposes.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which enacts this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that this Code section is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would
have repealed this Code section.

37-1-3.
Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities; members; removal.

There is created the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. The powers, functions, and duties of the Board
of Human Resources as they existed on June 30, 2009, with regard to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases are transferred to the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities
effective July 1, 2009. The board shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

The Governor shall designate the initial terms of the members of the board as follows: three members shall be appointed for one year; three members shall be appointed for two years; and three members shall be appointed for three years. Thereafter, all
succeeding appointments shall be for three-year terms from the expiration of the previous term.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant. An appointment to fill a vacancy other than by expiration of a term of office shall be for the
balance of the unexpired term.

Members of the board may be removed from office under the same conditions for removal from office of members of professional licensing boards provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

There shall be a chairperson of the board elected by and from the membership of the board who shall be the presiding officer of the board.

The members of the board shall receive a per diem allowance and expenses as shall be set and approved by the Office of Planning and Budget in conformance with rates and allowances set for members of other state boards.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

37-1-4.
Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities; functions, duties; commissioner.

There is created a Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. The powers, functions, and duties of the Department of Human Resources as they existed on June 30, 2009, relating to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities,
and Addictive Diseases are transferred to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities effective July 1, 2009.

There is created the position of commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer of the department and be both appointed and removed by the board, subject to the approval of
the Governor. Subject to the general policy established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department.

There shall be created in the department such divisions as may be found necessary for its effective operation. The commissioner shall have the power to allocate and reallocate functions among the divisions within the department.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

37-1-5.
Department to succeed to applicable rules and regulations; transfer of rights, responsibilities, duties, personnel, and property.

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, or scheduled to go into
effect on or after July 1, 2009, and which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities pursuant to Code Section 37-1-4 and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges,
entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities pursuant
to Code Section 37-1-4. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental
Disabilities by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by the Department of Human Resources which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of
Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities pursuant to Code Section 37-1-4 shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the
functions to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. In all such instances, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall be substituted for the Department of Human Resources,
and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Human Resources in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities pursuant to Code Section 37-1-4 on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1,
2009, become employees of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities. Such employees shall be
subject to the employment practices and policies of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced
as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred
employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement
system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the
Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

On July 1, 2009, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall receive custody of the state owned real property in the custody of the Department of Human Resources on June 30, 2009, and which pertains to the functions transferred
to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities pursuant to Code Section 37-1-4.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-56/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “State Personnel Administration” was substituted for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” twice in the third sentence of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative
Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

37-1-6.
Service of notice of pendency of action by second original process.

When any action is brought against the department, the board, the commissioner, or any employee or agent thereof or when any action is brought in which the department could be held responsible for damages awarded in such action, it shall be the duty of
the plaintiff to provide for service of notice of the pendency of such action by providing for service of a second original process, issued from the court in which the action is filed, upon the commissioner personally or upon a person
designated by the commissioner in writing to serve as agent for the acceptance of such service of process. The service of process in such action shall not be perfected until such second original process has been served as provided
in this Code section. The provisions of this Code section shall be cumulative of any other requirements imposed by law for the service of process or notice.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 1/SB 244.

37-1-7.
Funding for new co-responder programs.

The state shall provide funding for a minimum of five new co-responder programs established pursuant to Title 37. Each such program shall have a minimum of one co-responder team.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 4-7/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.